New York, session 2025-2026, A4911.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 347 of the education law, as amended by chapter 351 2 of the laws of 2018, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 347. Violations. Any test agency which violates any section of this 4 article shall be liable for a civil penalty of not more than [one] two 5 thousand dollars for each violation. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09042-01-5